Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1205
Sections; posting.

Every employer subject to the provisions of sections 48-1201 to 48-1209 shall keep a summary of sections 48-1201 to 48-1209, furnished by the Commissioner of Labor without charge, posted in a conspicuous place on or about the premises wherein any person subject to the provisions of sections 48-1201 to 48-1209 is employed.

Laws 1967, c. 285, § 5, p. 775.